Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.130

Defaulted debts, judgments to be charged off—Valuation of assets.

Based on examinations directed pursuant to RCW 30A.04.060 or other appropriate information, all assets or portion thereof that the director may have required a bank to charge off shall be charged off. No bank shall enter or at any time carry on its books any of its assets or liabilities at a valuation contrary to generally accepted accounting principles.

[ 2014 c 37 s 115. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 34; 1994 c 92 s 16; 1986 c 279 s 6; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.130; prior: 1937 c 61 s 1; 1919 c 209 s 15; 1917 c 80 s 47; RRS s 3254. Formerly RCW 30.04.130.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.